Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.040

Action on petition.

Upon the filing of the petition and bond and being satisfied that the petition has been signed by freeholders residing in the vicinity of the proposed road, the board shall direct the county road engineer to report upon the project.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.81.040. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 20, part; RRS s 6450-20, part.]